Illinois, session 104th, HB2983.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 2-112, 6-106.1, 6-109, 6-117, 6-301, 6-411, 66-521, 7-211, 7-503, 11-306, 11-307, 11-501.1, 11-703, and 711-1425 as follows: 8    (625 ILCS 5/2-112)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 2-112)9    Sec. 2-112. Distribution of synopsis laws. 10    (a) The Secretary of State may publish a synopsis or 11summary of the laws of this State regulating the operation of 12vehicles and may deliver a copy thereof without charge with 13each original vehicle registration and with each original 14driver's license.15    (b) The Secretary of State shall make any necessary 16revisions in its publications, including, but not limited to, 17the Illinois Rules of the Road, to accurately conform its 18publications to the provisions of the Pedestrians with 19Disabilities Safety Act. 20    (c) The Secretary of State shall include, in the Illinois 21Rules of the Road publication, information advising drivers of 22the laws and best practices for safely sharing the roadway 23with bicyclists and pedestrians, including, but not limited   HB2983 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1to, information advising drivers to use the Dutch Reach method 2when opening a vehicle door after parallel parking on a street 3(checking the rear-view mirror, checking the side-view mirror, 4then opening the door with the right hand, thereby reducing 5the risk of injuring a bicyclist or opening the door in the 6path a vehicle approaching from behind).7    (d) The Secretary of State shall include, in the Illinois 8Rules of the Road publication, information advising drivers to 9use the zipper merge method when merging into a reduced number 10of lanes (drivers in merging lanes are expected to use both 11lanes to advance to the lane reduction point and merge at that 12location, alternating turns).13    (e) The Secretary of State, in consultation with the 14Illinois State Police, shall include in the Illinois Rules of 15the Road publication a description of law enforcement 16procedures during traffic stops and the actions that a 17motorist should take during a traffic stop, including 18appropriate interactions with law enforcement officers. 19    (f) The Secretary of State shall include, in the Illinois 20Rules of Road publication, information advising drivers on 21best practices related to stranded motorists. This may 22include, but is not limited to, how to safely pull the vehicle 23out of traffic, activating hazard lights, when to remain in a 24vehicle, how to safely exit a stranded vehicle, where to find a 25safe place outside the stranded vehicle, and emergency numbers 26to call for assistance.   HB2983 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    (g) The Secretary of State shall include, in the Illinois 2Rules of the Road publication, information pertaining to the 3transportation of hazardous materials. The information shall 4include an image and description that details the various 5hazardous material placards used on vehicles that transport 6hazardous materials. 7(Source: P.A. 102-455, eff. 1-1-22; 103-249, eff. 1-1-24; 8103-989, eff. 1-1-25.) 9    (625 ILCS 5/6-106.1)10    Sec. 6-106.1. School bus driver permit. 11    (a) The Secretary of State shall issue a school bus driver 12permit for the operation of first or second division vehicles 13being operated as school buses or a permit valid only for the 14operation of first division vehicles being operated as school 15buses to those applicants who have met all the requirements of 16the application and screening process under this Section to 17insure the welfare and safety of children who are transported 18on school buses throughout the State of Illinois. Applicants 19shall obtain the proper application required by the Secretary 20of State from their prospective or current employer and submit 21the completed application to the prospective or current 22employer along with the necessary fingerprint submission as 23required by the Illinois State Police to conduct 24fingerprint-based criminal background checks on current and 25future information available in the State system and current   HB2983 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1information available through the Federal Bureau of 2Investigation's system. Applicants who have completed the 3fingerprinting requirements shall not be subjected to the 4fingerprinting process when applying for subsequent permits or 5submitting proof of successful completion of the annual 6refresher course. Individuals who on July 1, 1995 (the 7effective date of Public Act 88-612) possess a valid school 8bus driver permit that has been previously issued by the 9appropriate Regional School Superintendent are not subject to 10the fingerprinting provisions of this Section as long as the 11permit remains valid and does not lapse. The applicant shall 12be required to pay all related application and fingerprinting 13fees as established by rule, including, but not limited to, 14the amounts established by the Illinois State Police and the 15Federal Bureau of Investigation to process fingerprint-based 16criminal background investigations. All fees paid for 17fingerprint processing services under this Section shall be 18deposited into the State Police Services Fund for the cost 19incurred in processing the fingerprint-based criminal 20background investigations. All other fees paid under this 21Section shall be deposited into the Road Fund for the purpose 22of defraying the costs of the Secretary of State in 23administering this Section. All applicants must: 24        1. be 21 years of age or older; 25        2. possess a valid and properly classified driver's 26    license issued by the Secretary of State;   HB2983 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1        3. possess a valid driver's license, which has not 2    been revoked, suspended, or canceled for 3 years 3    immediately prior to the date of application, or have not 4    had his or her commercial motor vehicle driving privileges 5    disqualified within the 3 years immediately prior to the 6    date of application; 7        4. unless the applicant holds a valid commercial 8    driver's license or a commercial driver's license that 9    expired in the preceding 30 days issued by another state 10    with a school bus and passenger endorsement, successfully 11    pass a first division or second division written test, 12    administered by the Secretary of State, on school bus 13    operation, school bus safety, and special traffic laws 14    relating to school buses and submit to a review of the 15    applicant's driving habits by the Secretary of State at 16    the time the written test is given. For purposes of this 17    paragraph, "state" means a state of the United States and 18    the District of Columbia; 19        5. demonstrate ability to exercise reasonable care in 20    the operation of school buses in accordance with rules 21    promulgated by the Secretary of State; 22        6. demonstrate physical fitness to operate school 23    buses by submitting the results of a medical examination, 24    including tests for drug use for each applicant not 25    subject to such testing pursuant to federal law, conducted 26    by a licensed physician, a licensed advanced practice   HB2983 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    registered nurse, or a licensed physician assistant within 2    90 days of the date of application according to standards 3    promulgated by the Secretary of State; 4        7. affirm under penalties of perjury that he or she 5    has not made a false statement or knowingly concealed a 6    material fact in any application for permit; 7        8. have completed an initial classroom course, 8    including first aid procedures, in school bus driver 9    safety as promulgated by the Secretary of State and, after 10    satisfactory completion of said initial course, an annual 11    refresher course; such courses and the agency or 12    organization conducting such courses shall be approved by 13    the Secretary of State; failure to complete the annual 14    refresher course shall result in cancellation of the 15    permit until such course is completed; 16        9. not have been under an order of court supervision 17    for or convicted of 2 or more serious traffic offenses, as 18    defined by rule, within one year prior to the date of 19    application that may endanger the life or safety of any of 20    the driver's passengers within the duration of the permit 21    period; 22        10. not have been under an order of court supervision 23    for or convicted of reckless driving, aggravated reckless 24    driving, driving while under the influence of alcohol, 25    other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or 26    any combination thereof, or reckless homicide resulting   HB2983 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    from the operation of a motor vehicle within 3 years of the 2    date of application; 3        11. not have been convicted of committing or 4    attempting to commit any one or more of the following 5    offenses: (i) those offenses defined in Sections 8-1, 6    8-1.2, 9-1, 9-1.2, 9-2, 9-2.1, 9-3, 9-3.2, 9-3.3, 10-1, 7    10-2, 10-3.1, 10-4, 10-5, 10-5.1, 10-6, 10-7, 10-9, 8    11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-6.5, 9    11-6.6, 11-9, 11-9.1, 11-9.1A, 11-9.3, 11-9.4, 11-9.4-1, 10    11-14, 11-14.1, 11-14.3, 11-14.4, 11-15, 11-15.1, 11-16, 11    11-17, 11-17.1, 11-18, 11-18.1, 11-19, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 12    11-20, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, 11-20.4, 11-21, 11-22, 13    11-23, 11-24, 11-25, 11-26, 11-30, 12-2.6, 12-3.05, 14    12-3.1, 12-3.3, 12-4, 12-4.1, 12-4.2, 12-4.2-5, 12-4.3, 15    12-4.4, 12-4.5, 12-4.6, 12-4.7, 12-4.9, 12-5.3, 12-6, 16    12-6.2, 12-7.1, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 12-7.5, 12-11, 12-13, 17    12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, 12-16, 12-21.5, 12-21.6, 12-33, 18    12C-5, 12C-10, 12C-20, 12C-30, 12C-45, 16-16, 16-16.1, 19    18-1, 18-2, 18-3, 18-4, 18-5, 19-6, 20-1, 20-1.1, 20-1.2, 20    20-1.3, 20-2, 24-1, 24-1.1, 24-1.2, 24-1.2-5, 24-1.6, 21    24-1.7, 24-2.1, 24-3.3, 24-3.5, 24-3.8, 24-3.9, 31A-1.1, 22    33A-2, and 33D-1, in subsection (A), clauses (a) and (b), 23    of Section 24-3, and those offenses contained in Article 24    29D of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 25    2012; (ii) those offenses defined in the Cannabis Control 26    Act except those offenses defined in subsections (a) and   HB2983 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    (b) of Section 4, and subsection (a) of Section 5 of the 2    Cannabis Control Act; (iii) those offenses defined in the 3    Illinois Controlled Substances Act; (iv) those offenses 4    defined in the Methamphetamine Control and Community 5    Protection Act; (v) any offense committed or attempted in 6    any other state or against the laws of the United States, 7    which if committed or attempted in this State would be 8    punishable as one or more of the foregoing offenses; (vi) 9    the offenses defined in Section 4.1 and 5.1 of the Wrongs 10    to Children Act or Section 11-9.1A of the Criminal Code of 11    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; (vii) those offenses 12    defined in Section 6-16 of the Liquor Control Act of 1934; 13    and (viii) those offenses defined in the Methamphetamine 14    Precursor Control Act;15        12. not have been repeatedly involved as a driver in 16    motor vehicle collisions or been repeatedly convicted of 17    offenses against laws and ordinances regulating the 18    movement of traffic, to a degree which indicates lack of 19    ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable care in the 20    safe operation of a motor vehicle or disrespect for the 21    traffic laws and the safety of other persons upon the 22    highway; 23        13. not have, through the unlawful operation of a 24    motor vehicle, caused a crash resulting in the death of 25    any person; 26        14. not have, within the last 5 years, been adjudged   HB2983 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    to be afflicted with or suffering from any mental 2    disability or disease; 3        15. consent, in writing, to the release of results of 4    reasonable suspicion drug and alcohol testing under 5    Section 6-106.1c of this Code by the employer of the 6    applicant to the Secretary of State; and7        16. not have been convicted of committing or 8    attempting to commit within the last 20 years: (i) an 9    offense defined in subsection (c) of Section 4, subsection 10    (b) of Section 5, and subsection (a) of Section 8 of the 11    Cannabis Control Act; or (ii) any offenses in any other 12    state or against the laws of the United States that, if 13    committed or attempted in this State, would be punishable 14    as one or more of the foregoing offenses. 15    (a-5) If an applicant's driver's license has been 16suspended within the 3 years immediately prior to the date of 17application for the sole reason of failure to pay child 18support, that suspension shall not bar the applicant from 19receiving a school bus driver permit. 20    (a-10) By January 1, 2024, the Secretary of State, in 21conjunction with the Illinois State Board of Education, shall 22develop a separate classroom course and refresher course for 23operation of vehicles of the first division being operated as 24school buses. Regional superintendents of schools, working 25with the Illinois State Board of Education, shall offer the 26course.   HB2983 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    (b) A school bus driver permit shall be valid for a period 2specified by the Secretary of State as set forth by rule. It 3shall be renewable upon compliance with subsection (a) of this 4Section. 5    (c) A school bus driver permit shall contain the holder's 6driver's license number, legal name, residence address, zip 7code, and date of birth, a brief description of the holder, and 8a space for signature. The Secretary of State may require a 9suitable photograph of the holder. 10    (d) The employer shall be responsible for conducting a 11pre-employment interview with prospective school bus driver 12candidates, distributing school bus driver applications and 13medical forms to be completed by the applicant, and submitting 14the applicant's fingerprint cards to the Illinois State Police 15that are required for the criminal background investigations. 16The employer shall certify in writing to the Secretary of 17State that all pre-employment conditions have been 18successfully completed including the successful completion of 19an Illinois specific criminal background investigation through 20the Illinois State Police and the submission of necessary 21fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 22criminal history information available through the Federal 23Bureau of Investigation system. The applicant shall present 24the certification to the Secretary of State at the time of 25submitting the school bus driver permit application. 26    (e) Permits shall initially be provisional upon receiving   HB2983 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1certification from the employer that all pre-employment 2conditions have been successfully completed, and upon 3successful completion of all training and examination 4requirements for the classification of the vehicle to be 5operated, the Secretary of State shall provisionally issue a 6School Bus Driver Permit. The permit shall remain in a 7provisional status pending the completion of the Federal 8Bureau of Investigation's criminal background investigation 9based upon fingerprinting specimens submitted to the Federal 10Bureau of Investigation by the Illinois State Police. The 11Federal Bureau of Investigation shall report the findings 12directly to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State 13shall remove the bus driver permit from provisional status 14upon the applicant's successful completion of the Federal 15Bureau of Investigation's criminal background investigation. 16    (f) A school bus driver permit holder shall notify the 17employer and the Secretary of State if he or she is issued an 18order of court supervision for or convicted in another state 19of an offense that would make him or her ineligible for a 20permit under subsection (a) of this Section. The written 21notification shall be made within 5 days of the entry of the 22order of court supervision or conviction. Failure of the 23permit holder to provide the notification is punishable as a 24petty offense for a first violation and a Class B misdemeanor 25for a second or subsequent violation. 26    (g) Cancellation; suspension; notice and procedure.   HB2983 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1        (1) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 2    driver permit of an applicant whose criminal background 3    investigation discloses that he or she is not in 4    compliance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this 5    Section. 6        (2) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 7    driver permit when he or she receives notice that the 8    permit holder fails to comply with any provision of this 9    Section or any rule promulgated for the administration of 10    this Section. 11        (3) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 12    driver permit if the permit holder's restricted commercial 13    or commercial driving privileges are withdrawn or 14    otherwise invalidated. 15        (4) The Secretary of State may not issue a school bus 16    driver permit for a period of 3 years to an applicant who 17    fails to obtain a negative result on a drug test as 18    required in item 6 of subsection (a) of this Section or 19    under federal law. 20        (5) The Secretary of State shall forthwith suspend a 21    school bus driver permit for a period of 3 years upon 22    receiving notice that the holder has failed to obtain a 23    negative result on a drug test as required in item 6 of 24    subsection (a) of this Section or under federal law. 25        (6) The Secretary of State shall suspend a school bus 26    driver permit for a period of 3 years upon receiving   HB2983 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    notice from the employer that the holder failed to perform 2    the inspection procedure set forth in subsection (a) or 3    (b) of Section 12-816 of this Code. 4        (7) The Secretary of State shall suspend a school bus 5    driver permit for a period of 3 years upon receiving 6    notice from the employer that the holder refused to submit 7    to an alcohol or drug test as required by Section 6-106.1c 8    or has submitted to a test required by that Section which 9    disclosed an alcohol concentration of more than 0.00 or 10    disclosed a positive result on a National Institute on 11    Drug Abuse five-drug panel, utilizing federal standards 12    set forth in 49 CFR 40.87. 13    The Secretary of State shall notify the State 14Superintendent of Education and the permit holder's 15prospective or current employer that the applicant (1) has 16failed a criminal background investigation or (2) is no longer 17eligible for a school bus driver permit; and of the related 18cancellation of the applicant's provisional school bus driver 19permit. The cancellation shall remain in effect pending the 20outcome of a hearing pursuant to Section 2-118 of this Code. 21The scope of the hearing shall be limited to the issuance 22criteria contained in subsection (a) of this Section. A 23petition requesting a hearing shall be submitted to the 24Secretary of State and shall contain the reason the individual 25feels he or she is entitled to a school bus driver permit. The 26permit holder's employer shall notify in writing to the   HB2983 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1Secretary of State that the employer has certified the removal 2of the offending school bus driver from service prior to the 3start of that school bus driver's next work shift. An 4employing school board that fails to remove the offending 5school bus driver from service is subject to the penalties 6defined in Section 3-14.23 of the School Code. A school bus 7contractor who violates a provision of this Section is subject 8to the penalties defined in Section 6-106.11. 9    All valid school bus driver permits issued under this 10Section prior to January 1, 1995, shall remain effective until 11their expiration date unless otherwise invalidated. 12    (h) When a school bus driver permit holder who is a service 13member is called to active duty, the employer of the permit 14holder shall notify the Secretary of State, within 30 days of 15notification from the permit holder, that the permit holder 16has been called to active duty. Upon notification pursuant to 17this subsection, (i) the Secretary of State shall characterize 18the permit as inactive until a permit holder renews the permit 19as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, and (ii) if a 20permit holder fails to comply with the requirements of this 21Section while called to active duty, the Secretary of State 22shall not characterize the permit as invalid. 23    (i) A school bus driver permit holder who is a service 24member returning from active duty must, within 90 days, renew 25a permit characterized as inactive pursuant to subsection (h) 26of this Section by complying with the renewal requirements of   HB2983 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1subsection (b) of this Section. 2    (j) For purposes of subsections (h) and (i) of this 3Section: 4    "Active duty" means active duty pursuant to an executive 5order of the President of the United States, an act of the 6Congress of the United States, or an order of the Governor. 7    "Service member" means a member of the Armed Services or 8reserve forces of the United States or a member of the Illinois 9National Guard. 10    (k) A private carrier employer of a school bus driver 11permit holder, having satisfied the employer requirements of 12this Section, shall be held to a standard of ordinary care for 13intentional acts committed in the course of employment by the 14bus driver permit holder. This subsection (k) shall in no way 15limit the liability of the private carrier employer for 16violation of any provision of this Section or for the 17negligent hiring or retention of a school bus driver permit 18holder. 19(Source: P.A. 102-168, eff. 7-27-21; 102-299, eff. 8-6-21; 20102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-726, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 215-13-22; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 102-1130, eff. 7-1-23; 103-605, 22eff. 7-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25.) 23    (625 ILCS 5/6-109)24    Sec. 6-109. Examination of applicants. 25    (a) The Secretary of State shall examine every applicant   HB2983 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1for a driver's license or permit who has not been previously 2licensed as a driver under the laws of this State or any other 3state or country, or any applicant for renewal of such 4driver's license or permit when such license or permit has 5been expired for more than one year. The Secretary of State 6shall, subject to the provisions of paragraph (c), examine 7every licensed driver at least every 8 years, and may examine 8or re-examine any other applicant or licensed driver, provided 9that during the years 1984 through 1991 those drivers issued a 10license for 3 years may be re-examined not less than every 7 11years or more than every 10 years.12    The Secretary of State shall require the testing of the 13eyesight of any driver's license or permit applicant who has 14not been previously licensed as a driver under the laws of this 15State and shall promulgate rules and regulations to provide 16for the orderly administration of all the provisions of this 17Section.18    The Secretary of State shall include at least one test 19question that concerns the provisions of the Pedestrians with 20Disabilities Safety Act in the question pool used for the 21written portion of the driver's license examination within one 22year after July 22, 2010 (the effective date of Public Act 2396-1167). 24    The Secretary of State shall include, in the question pool 25used for the written portion of the driver's license 26examination, test questions concerning safe driving in the   HB2983 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1presence of bicycles, of which one may be concerning the Dutch 2Reach method as described in Section 2-112. 3    The Secretary of State shall include, in the question pool 4used for the written portion of the driver's license 5examination, at least one test question concerning driver 6responsibilities when approaching a stationary emergency 7vehicle as described in Section 11-907. If an applicant gives 8an incorrect response to a test question concerning subsection 9(c) of Section 11-907, Section 11-907.5, or subsection (a-1) 10of Section 11-908, then the Secretary of State shall provide 11the applicant with information concerning those Sections. 12    (b) Except as provided for those applicants in paragraph 13(c), such examination shall include a test of the applicant's 14eyesight, his or her ability to read and understand official 15traffic control devices, his or her knowledge of safe driving 16practices and the traffic laws of this State, and may include 17an actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to exercise 18ordinary and reasonable control of the operation of a motor 19vehicle, and such further physical and mental examination as 20the Secretary of State finds necessary to determine the 21applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle safely on the 22highways, except the examination of an applicant 75 years of 23age or older or, if the Secretary adopts rules under Section 37 24of the Secretary of State Act to raise the age requirement for 25actual demonstrations, the examination of an applicant who has 26attained that increased age or is older shall include an   HB2983 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to exercise 2ordinary and reasonable control of the operation of a motor 3vehicle. All portions of written and verbal examinations under 4this Section, excepting where the English language appears on 5facsimiles of road signs, may be given in the Spanish language 6and, at the discretion of the Secretary of State, in any other 7language as well as in English upon request of the examinee. 8Deaf persons who are otherwise qualified are not prohibited 9from being issued a license, other than a commercial driver's 10license, under this Code. The examination to test an 11applicant's ability to read and understand official traffic 12control devices and knowledge of safe driving practices and 13the traffic laws of this State may be administered at a 14Secretary of State facility, remotely via the Internet, or in 15a manner otherwise specified by the Secretary of State by 16administrative rule. 17    (c) Re-examination for those applicants who at the time of 18renewing their driver's license possess a driving record 19devoid of any convictions of traffic violations or evidence of 20committing an offense for which mandatory revocation would be 21required upon conviction pursuant to Section 6-205 at the time 22of renewal shall be in a manner prescribed by the Secretary in 23order to determine an applicant's ability to safely operate a 24motor vehicle, except that every applicant for the renewal of 25a driver's license who is 75 years of age or older or, if the 26Secretary adopts rules under Section 37 of the Secretary of   HB2983 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1State Act to raise the age requirement for actual 2demonstrations, every applicant for the renewal of a driver's 3license who has attained that increased age or is older must 4prove, by an actual demonstration, the applicant's ability to 5exercise reasonable care in the safe operation of a motor 6vehicle.7    (d) In the event the applicant is not ineligible under the 8provisions of Section 6-103 to receive a driver's license, the 9Secretary of State shall make provision for giving an 10examination, either in the county where the applicant resides 11or at a place adjacent thereto reasonably convenient to the 12applicant, within not more than 30 days from the date said 13application is received.14    (e) The Secretary of State may adopt rules regarding the 15use of foreign language interpreters during the application 16and examination process. 17(Source: P.A. 103-140, eff. 6-30-23; 103-680, eff. 1-1-25.) 18    (625 ILCS 5/6-117)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-117)19    Sec. 6-117. Records to be kept by the Secretary of State. 20    (a) The Secretary of State shall file every application 21for a license or permit accepted under this Chapter, and shall 22maintain suitable indexes thereof. The records of the 23Secretary of State shall indicate the action taken with 24respect to such applications.25    (b) The Secretary of State shall maintain appropriate   HB2983 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1records of all licenses and permits refused, cancelled, 2disqualified, revoked, or suspended and of the revocation, 3suspension, and disqualification of driving privileges of 4persons not licensed under this Chapter, and such records 5shall note the reasons for such action.6    (c) The Secretary of State shall maintain appropriate 7records of convictions reported under this Chapter. Records of 8conviction may be maintained in a computer processible medium.9    (d) The Secretary of State may also maintain appropriate 10records of any crash reports received.11    (e) The Secretary of State shall also maintain appropriate 12records of any disposition of supervision or records relative 13to a driver's referral to a driver remedial or rehabilitative 14program, as required by the Secretary of State or the courts. 15Such records shall only be available for use by the Secretary, 16the driver licensing administrator of any other state, law 17enforcement agencies, the courts, and the affected driver or, 18upon proper verification, such affected driver's attorney.19    (f) The Secretary of State shall also maintain or contract 20to maintain appropriate records of all photographs and 21signatures obtained in the process of issuing any driver's 22license, permit, or identification card. The record shall be 23confidential and shall not be disclosed except to those 24entities listed under Section 6-110.1 of this Code.25    (g) The Secretary of State may establish a First Person 26Consent organ and tissue donor registry in compliance with   HB2983 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1subsection (b-1) of Section 5-20 of the Illinois Anatomical 2Gift Act, as follows:3        (1) The Secretary shall offer, to each applicant for 4    issuance or renewal of a driver's license or 5    identification card who is 16 years of age or older, the 6    opportunity to have his or her name included in the First 7    Person Consent organ and tissue donor registry. The 8    Secretary must advise the applicant or licensee that he or 9    she is under no compulsion to have his or her name included 10    in the registry. An individual who agrees to having his or 11    her name included in the First Person Consent organ and 12    tissue donor registry has given full legal consent to the 13    donation of any of his or her organs or tissue upon his or 14    her death. A brochure explaining this method of executing 15    an anatomical gift must be given to each applicant for 16    issuance or renewal of a driver's license or 17    identification card. The brochure must advise the 18    applicant or licensee (i) that he or she is under no 19    compulsion to have his or her name included in this 20    registry and (ii) that he or she may wish to consult with 21    family, friends, or clergy before doing so.22        (2) The Secretary of State may establish additional 23    methods by which an individual may have his or her name 24    included in the First Person Consent organ and tissue 25    donor registry.26        (3) When an individual has agreed to have his or her   HB2983 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    name included in the First Person Consent organ and tissue 2    donor registry, the Secretary of State shall note that 3    agreement in the First Person consent organ and tissue 4    donor registry. Representatives of federally designated 5    organ procurement agencies and tissue banks and the 6    offices of Illinois county coroners and medical examiners 7    may inquire of the Secretary of State whether a potential 8    organ donor's name is included in the First Person Consent 9    organ and tissue donor registry, and the Secretary of 10    State may provide that information to the representative.11        (4) An individual may withdraw his or her consent to 12    be listed in the First Person Consent organ and tissue 13    donor registry maintained by the Secretary of State by 14    notifying the Secretary of State in writing, or by any 15    other means approved by the Secretary, of the individual's 16    decision to have his or her name removed from the 17    registry.18        (5) The Secretary of State may undertake additional 19    efforts, including education and awareness activities, to 20    promote organ and tissue donation.21        (6) In the absence of gross negligence or willful 22    misconduct, the Secretary of State and his or her 23    employees are immune from any civil or criminal liability 24    in connection with an individual's consent to be listed in 25    the organ and tissue donor registry. 26    (h) The Secretary of State may destroy a driving record   HB2983 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1created 20 or more years ago for a person who was convicted of 2an offense and who did not have an Illinois driver's license if 3the record no longer contains any convictions or withdrawal of 4driving privileges due to the convictions. 5(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-301)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-301)7    Sec. 6-301. Unlawful use of license or permit. 8    (a) It is a violation of this Section for any person: 9        1. To display or cause to be displayed or have in his 10    possession any cancelled, revoked or suspended license or 11    permit; 12        2. To lend his license or permit to any other person or 13    knowingly allow the use thereof by another; 14        3. To display or represent as his own any license or 15    permit issued to another; 16        4. To fail or refuse to surrender to the Secretary of 17    State or his agent or any peace officer upon his lawful 18    demand, any license or permit, which has been suspended, 19    revoked, or cancelled; 20        5. To allow any unlawful use of a license or permit 21    issued to him; 22        6. To submit to an examination or to obtain the 23    services of another person to submit to an examination for 24    the purpose of obtaining a drivers license or permit for 25    some other person. For purposes of this subsection,   HB2983 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    "submit to an examination" includes providing answers to 2    the person taking the examination, whether those answers 3    are provided in-person or remotely, via any electronic 4    device, including, but not limited to, microphones and 5    cell phones. 6    (b) Sentence. 7        1. Any person convicted of a violation of this Section 8    shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and shall be 9    sentenced to a minimum fine of $500 or 50 hours of 10    community service, preferably at an alcohol abuse 11    prevention program, if available. 12        2. Any person convicted of a second or subsequent 13    violation of this Section shall be guilty of a Class 4 14    felony. 15        3. In addition to any other sentence imposed under 16    paragraph 1 or 2 of this subsection (b), a person 17    convicted of a violation of paragraph 6 of subsection (a) 18    shall be imprisoned for not less than 7 days.19    (c) This Section does not prohibit any lawfully authorized 20investigative, protective, law enforcement or other activity 21of any agency of the United States, State of Illinois or any 22other state or political subdivision thereof.23    (d) This Section does not apply to licenses and permits 24invalidated under Section 6-301.3 of this Code.25(Source: P.A. 92-647, eff. 1-1-03; 92-883, eff. 1-13-03.)   HB2983 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    (625 ILCS 5/6-411)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-411)2    Sec. 6-411. Qualifications of Driver Training Instructors. 3In order to qualify for a license as an instructor for a 4driving school, an applicant must:5        (a) Be of good moral character;6        (b) Authorize an investigation to include a 7    fingerprint based background check to determine if the 8    applicant has ever been convicted of a crime and if so, the 9    disposition of those convictions; this authorization shall 10    indicate the scope of the inquiry and the agencies which 11    may be contacted. Upon this authorization the Secretary of 12    State may request and receive information and assistance 13    from any federal, state, or local governmental agency as 14    part of the authorized investigation. Each applicant shall 15    submit his or her fingerprints to the Illinois State 16    Police in the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois 17    State Police. These fingerprints shall be checked against 18    the fingerprint records now and hereafter filed in the 19    Illinois State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation 20    criminal history records databases. The Illinois State 21    Police shall charge a fee for conducting the criminal 22    history records check, which shall be deposited in the 23    State Police Services Fund and shall not exceed the actual 24    cost of the records check. The applicant shall be required 25    to pay all related fingerprint fees, including, but not 26    limited to, the amounts established by the Illinois State   HB2983 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to process 2    fingerprint based criminal background investigations. The 3    Illinois State Police shall provide information concerning 4    any criminal convictions, and their disposition, brought 5    against the applicant upon request of the Secretary of 6    State when the request is made in the form and manner 7    required by the Illinois State Police. Unless otherwise 8    prohibited by law, the information derived from this 9    investigation, including the source of this information, 10    and any conclusions or recommendations derived from this 11    information by the Secretary of State shall be provided to 12    the applicant, or his designee, upon request to the 13    Secretary of State, prior to any final action by the 14    Secretary of State on the application. At any 15    administrative hearing held under Section 2-118 of this 16    Code relating to the denial, cancellation, suspension, or 17    revocation of a driver training school license, the 18    Secretary of State is authorized to utilize at that 19    hearing any criminal histories, criminal convictions, and 20    disposition information obtained under this Section. Any 21    criminal convictions and their disposition information 22    obtained by the Secretary of State shall be confidential 23    and may not be transmitted outside the Office of the 24    Secretary of State, except as required herein, and may not 25    be transmitted to anyone within the Office of the 26    Secretary of State except as needed for the purpose of   HB2983 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    evaluating the applicant. The information obtained from 2    this investigation may be maintained by the Secretary of 3    State or any agency to which such information was 4    transmitted. Only information and standards which bear a 5    reasonable and rational relation to the performance of a 6    driver training instructor shall be used by the Secretary 7    of State. Any employee of the Secretary of State who gives 8    or causes to be given away any confidential information 9    concerning any criminal charges and their disposition of 10    an applicant shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor 11    unless release of such information is authorized by this 12    Section;13        (c) Pass such examination as the Secretary of State 14    shall require on (1) traffic laws, (2) safe driving 15    practices, (3) operation of motor vehicles, and (4) 16    qualifications of teacher;17        (d) Be physically able to operate safely a motor 18    vehicle and to train others in the operation of motor 19    vehicles. An instructors license application must be 20    accompanied by a medical examination report completed by a 21    competent medical examiner as defined in Section 6-901 of 22    this Code physician licensed to practice in the State of 23    Illinois;24        (e) Hold a valid Illinois drivers license;25        (f) Have graduated from an accredited high school 26    after at least 4 years of high school education or the   HB2983 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    equivalent; and2        (g) Pay to the Secretary of State an application and 3    license fee of $70.4    If a driver training school class room instructor teaches 5an approved driver education course, as defined in Section 61-103 of this Code, to students under 18 years of age, he or 7she shall furnish to the Secretary of State a certificate 8issued by the State Board of Education that the said 9instructor is qualified and meets the minimum educational 10standards for teaching driver education courses in the local 11public or parochial school systems, except that no State Board 12of Education certification shall be required of any instructor 13who teaches exclusively in a commercial driving school. On and 14after July 1, 1986, the existing rules and regulations of the 15State Board of Education concerning commercial driving schools 16shall continue to remain in effect but shall be administered 17by the Secretary of State until such time as the Secretary of 18State shall amend or repeal the rules in accordance with the 19Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. Upon request, the 20Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of completion to 21a student under 18 years of age who has completed an approved 22driver education course at a commercial driving school.23(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 24    (625 ILCS 5/6-521)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-521)25    Sec. 6-521. Rulemaking Authority.   HB2983 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    (a) The Secretary of State, using the authority to license 2motor vehicle operators under this Code, may adopt such rules 3and regulations as may be necessary to establish standards, 4policies, and procedures for the licensing and sanctioning of 5commercial motor vehicle drivers in order to meet the 6requirements of the Commercial Motor Vehicle Act of 1986 7(CMVSA); subsequent federal rulemaking under 49 C.F.R. Part 8383 or Part 1572; and administrative and policy decisions of 9the U.S. Secretary of Transportation and the Federal Motor 10Carrier Safety Administration. The Secretary may, as provided 11in the CMVSA, establish stricter requirements for the 12licensing of commercial motor vehicle drivers than those 13established by the federal government.14    (b) By January 1, 1994, the Secretary of State shall 15establish rules and regulations for the issuance of a 16restricted commercial driver's license for farm-related 17service industries consistent with federal guidelines. The 18restricted license shall be available for a seasonal period or 19periods not to exceed a total of 210 180 days in any 12-month 2012 month period.21    (c) (Blank).22    (d) By July 1, 1995, the Secretary of State shall 23establish rules and regulations for the issuance and 24cancellation of a School Bus Driver's Permit. The permit shall 25be required for the operation of a school bus as provided in 26subsection (c), a non-restricted CDL with passenger   HB2983 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1endorsement, or a properly classified driver's license. The 2permit will establish that the school bus driver has met all 3the requirements of the application and screening process 4established by Section 6-106.1 of this Code.5(Source: P.A. 98-726, eff. 1-1-15.) 6    (625 ILCS 5/7-211)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 7-211)7    Sec. 7-211. Duration of suspension. 8    (a) Unless a suspension is terminated under other 9provisions of this Code, the driver's license or registration 10and nonresident's operating privilege suspended as provided in 11Section 7-205 shall remain suspended and shall not be renewed 12nor shall any license or registration be issued to the person 13until:14        1. The person deposits or there shall be deposited and 15    filed on the person's behalf the security required under 16    Section 7-201;17        2. (Blank) Two years have elapsed following the date 18    the driver's license and registrations were suspended and 19    evidence satisfactory to the Secretary of State that 20    during the period no action for damages arising out of a 21    motor vehicle crash has been properly filed;22        3. Receipt of proper notice that the person has filed 23    bankruptcy which would include all claims for personal 24    injury and property damage resulting from the crash;25        4. (Blank) After the expiration of 5 years from the   HB2983 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    date of the crash, the Secretary of State has not received 2    documentation that any action at law for damages arising 3    out of the motor vehicle crash has been filed against the 4    person; or5        5. The applicable statute of limitations has expired 6    and the person seeking reinstatement provides evidence 7    satisfactory to the Secretary of State that, during the 8    statute of limitations period, no action for damages 9    arising out of a motor vehicle crash has been properly 10    filed. 11    An affidavit that no action at law for damages arising out 12of the motor vehicle crash has been filed against the 13applicant, or if filed that it is not still pending shall be 14prima facie evidence of that fact. The Secretary of State may 15take whatever steps are necessary to verify the statement set 16forth in the applicant's affidavit.17    (b) The driver's license or registration and nonresident's 18operating privileges suspended as provided in Section 7-205 19shall also remain suspended and shall not be renewed nor shall 20any license or registration be issued to the person until the 21person gives proof of his or her financial responsibility in 22the future as provided in Section 1-164.5. The proof is to be 23maintained by the person in a manner satisfactory to the 24Secretary of State for a period of 3 years after the date the 25proof is first filed.26(Source: P.A. 102-52, eff. 1-1-22; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.)   HB2983 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    (625 ILCS 5/7-503)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 7-503)2    Sec. 7-503. Unclaimed Security Deposits. During July, 3annually, the Secretary shall compile a list of all securities 4on deposit, pursuant to this Article, for one year since the 5expiration of the applicable statute of limitations more than 63 years and concerning which he has received no notice as to 7the pendency of any judicial proceeding that could affect the 8disposition thereof. Thereupon, he shall promptly send a 9notice to the last known address of each depositor advising 10him that his deposit will be subject to escheat to the State of 11Illinois if not claimed within 30 days after the mailing date 12of such notice. At the expiration of such time, the Secretary 13of State shall file with the State Treasurer an order 14directing the transfer of such deposit to the general revenue 15fund in the State Treasury. Upon receipt of such order, the 16State Treasurer shall make such transfer, after converting to 17cash any other type of security. Thereafter any person having 18a legal claim against such deposit may enforce it by 19appropriate proceedings in the Court of Claims subject to the 20limitations prescribed for such Court. At the expiration of 21such limitation period such deposit shall escheat to the State 22of Illinois.23(Source: P.A. 94-239, eff. 1-1-06.) 24    (625 ILCS 5/11-306)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-306)  HB2983 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    Sec. 11-306. Traffic-control signal legend. Whenever 2traffic is controlled by traffic-control signals exhibiting 3different colored lights or color lighted arrows, successively 4one at a time or in combination, only the colors green, red, 5and yellow shall be used, except for special pedestrian 6signals carrying a word legend, and the lights shall indicate 7and apply to drivers of vehicles, bicyclists, and pedestrians 8as follows:9    (a) Green indication.10        1. Vehicular traffic facing a circular green signal 11    may proceed straight through or turn right or left unless 12    a sign at such place prohibits either such turn. Vehicular 13    traffic, including vehicles turning right or left, shall 14    yield the right of way to other vehicles, to bicyclists, 15    and to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection or an 16    adjacent crosswalk at the time such signal is exhibited.17        2. Vehicular traffic facing a green arrow signal, 18    shown alone or in combination with another indication, may 19    cautiously enter the intersection only to make the 20    movement indicated by such arrow, or such other movement 21    as is permitted by other indications shown at the same 22    time. Such vehicular traffic shall yield the right of way 23    to bicyclists and pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent 24    crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the 25    intersection.26        3. Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control   HB2983 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    signal, as provided in Section 11-307, pedestrians or 2    bicyclists facing any green signal, except when the sole 3    green signal is a turn arrow, may proceed across the 4    roadway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk.5    (b) Steady yellow indication.6        1. Vehicular traffic facing a steady circular yellow 7    or yellow arrow signal is thereby warned that the related 8    green movement is being terminated or that a red 9    indication will be exhibited immediately thereafter.10        2. Pedestrians facing a steady circular yellow or 11    yellow arrow signal, unless otherwise directed by a 12    pedestrian-control signal as provided in Section 11-307, 13    are thereby advised that there is insufficient time to 14    cross the roadway before a red indication is shown and no 15    pedestrian shall then start to cross the roadway.16    (b-5) Flashing yellow arrow indication. 17        1. Vehicular traffic facing a flashing yellow arrow 18    indication may cautiously enter the intersection only to 19    make the movement indicated by the arrow and shall yield 20    the right-of-way to other vehicles and pedestrians 21    lawfully within the intersection or an adjacent crosswalk 22    at the time the signal is exhibited. 23        2. Pedestrians facing a flashing yellow arrow 24    indication, unless otherwise directed by a 25    pedestrian-control signal as provided in Section 11-307, 26    may proceed across the roadway within any marked or   HB2983 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    unmarked crosswalk that crosses the lane or lanes used to 2    depart the intersection by traffic controlled by the 3    flashing yellow arrow indication. Pedestrians shall yield 4    the right-of-way to vehicles lawfully within the 5    intersection at the time that the flashing yellow signal 6    indication is first displayed. 7    (c) Steady red indication.8        1. Except as provided in paragraphs 3 and 3.5 of this 9    subsection (c), vehicular traffic facing a steady circular 10    red signal alone shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, 11    but if there is no such stop line, before entering the 12    crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or if 13    there is no such crosswalk, then before entering the 14    intersection, and shall remain standing until an 15    indication to proceed is shown.16        2. Except as provided in paragraphs 3 and 3.5 of this 17    subsection (c), vehicular traffic facing a steady red 18    arrow signal shall not enter the intersection to make the 19    movement indicated by the arrow and, unless entering the 20    intersection to make a movement permitted by another 21    signal, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if 22    there is no such stop line, before entering the crosswalk 23    on the near side of the intersection, or if there is no 24    such crosswalk, then before entering the intersection, and 25    shall remain standing until an indication permitting the 26    movement indicated by such red arrow is shown.  HB2983 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1        3. Except when a sign is in place prohibiting a turn 2    and local authorities by ordinance or State authorities by 3    rule or regulation prohibit any such turn, vehicular 4    traffic facing any steady red signal may cautiously enter 5    the intersection to turn right, or to turn left from a 6    one-way street into a one-way street, after stopping as 7    required by paragraph 1 or paragraph 2 of this subsection. 8    After stopping, the driver shall yield the right of way to 9    any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another 10    roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard 11    during the time such driver is moving across or within the 12    intersection or junction or roadways. Such driver shall 13    yield the right of way to pedestrians or bicyclists within 14    the intersection or an adjacent crosswalk.15        3.5. The In municipalities with less than 2,000,000 16    inhabitants, after stopping as required by paragraph 1 or 17    2 of this subsection, the driver of a motorcycle or 18    bicycle, facing a steady red signal which fails to change 19    to a green signal within a reasonable period of time not 20    less than 120 seconds because of a signal malfunction or 21    because the signal has failed to detect the arrival of the 22    motorcycle or bicycle due to the vehicle's size or weight, 23    shall have the right to proceed, after yielding the right 24    of way to oncoming traffic facing a green signal, subject 25    to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign 26    as required by Section 11-1204 of this Code.   HB2983 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1        4. Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control 2    signal as provided in Section 11-307, pedestrians facing a 3    steady circular red or red arrow signal alone shall not 4    enter the roadway.5    (d) In the event an official traffic control signal is 6erected and maintained at a place other than an intersection, 7the provisions of this Section shall be applicable except as 8to provisions which by their nature can have no application. 9Any stop required shall be at a traffic sign or a marking on 10the pavement indicating where the stop shall be made or, in the 11absence of such sign or marking, the stop shall be made at the 12signal.13    (e) The motorman of any streetcar shall obey the above 14signals as applicable to vehicles.15    (f) If an official traffic control signal is erected and 16maintained as a dedicated signal for bicyclists, that signal 17shall take precedence for bicyclists over other signals 18outlined in this Section. 19(Source: P.A. 97-627, eff. 1-1-12; 97-762, eff. 7-6-12; 2098-798, eff. 7-31-14.) 21    (625 ILCS 5/11-307)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-307)22    Sec. 11-307. Pedestrian-control signals. Whenever special 23pedestrian-control signals exhibiting the words "Walk" or 24"Don't Walk" or the illuminated symbols of a walking person or 25an upraised palm are in place such signals shall indicate as   HB2983 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1follows:2    (a) Walk or walking person symbol. Pedestrians facing such 3signal may proceed across the roadway in the direction of the 4signal, and shall be given the right of way by the drivers of 5all vehicles. Bicyclists may proceed across the roadway in the 6direction of the signal, shall be given the right of way by the 7drivers of all vehicles, and shall yield the right of way to 8all pedestrians. 9    (b) Don't Walk or upraised palm symbol. No pedestrian or 10bicyclist shall start to cross the roadway in the direction of 11such signal, but any pedestrian or bicyclist who has partly 12completed his crossing on the Walk signal or walking person 13symbol shall proceed to a sidewalk or safety island while the 14"Don't Walk" signal or upraised palm symbol is illuminated, 15steady, or flashing.16(Source: P.A. 81-553.) 17    (625 ILCS 5/11-501.1)18    Sec. 11-501.1. Suspension of drivers license; statutory 19summary alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound 20or compounds related suspension or revocation; implied 21consent. 22    (a) Any person who drives or is in actual physical control 23of a motor vehicle upon the public highways of this State shall 24be deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of 25Section 11-501.2, to a chemical test or tests of blood,   HB2983 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1breath, other bodily substance, or urine for the purpose of 2determining the content of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 3intoxicating compound or compounds or any combination thereof 4in the person's blood if arrested, as evidenced by the 5issuance of a Uniform Traffic Ticket, for any offense as 6defined in Section 11-501 or a similar provision of a local 7ordinance, or if arrested for violating Section 11-401. If a 8law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe the 9person was under the influence of alcohol, other drug or 10drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination 11thereof, the law enforcement officer shall request a chemical 12test or tests which shall be administered at the direction of 13the arresting officer. The law enforcement agency employing 14the officer shall designate which of the aforesaid tests shall 15be administered. Up to 2 additional tests of urine or other 16bodily substance may be administered even after a blood or 17breath test or both has been administered. For purposes of 18this Section, an Illinois law enforcement officer of this 19State who is investigating the person for any offense defined 20in Section 11-501 may travel into an adjoining state, where 21the person has been transported for medical care, to complete 22an investigation and to request that the person submit to the 23test or tests set forth in this Section. The requirements of 24this Section that the person be arrested are inapplicable, but 25the officer shall issue the person a Uniform Traffic Ticket 26for an offense as defined in Section 11-501 or a similar   HB2983 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1provision of a local ordinance prior to requesting that the 2person submit to the test or tests. The issuance of the Uniform 3Traffic Ticket shall not constitute an arrest, but shall be 4for the purpose of notifying the person that he or she is 5subject to the provisions of this Section and of the officer's 6belief of the existence of probable cause to arrest. Upon 7returning to this State, the officer shall file the Uniform 8Traffic Ticket with the Circuit Clerk of the county where the 9offense was committed, and shall seek the issuance of an 10arrest warrant or a summons for the person.11    (a-5) (Blank). 12    (b) Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is 13otherwise in a condition rendering the person incapable of 14refusal, shall be deemed not to have withdrawn the consent 15provided by paragraph (a) of this Section and the test or tests 16may be administered, subject to the provisions of Section 1711-501.2.18    (c) A person requested to submit to a test as provided 19above shall be warned by the law enforcement officer 20requesting the test that a refusal to submit to the test will 21result in the statutory summary suspension of the person's 22privilege to operate a motor vehicle, as provided in Section 236-208.1 of this Code, and will also result in the 24disqualification of the person's privilege to operate a 25commercial motor vehicle, as provided in Section 6-514 of this 26Code, if the person is a CDL holder. The person shall also be   HB2983 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1warned that a refusal to submit to the test, when the person 2was involved in a motor vehicle crash that caused personal 3injury or death to another, will result in the statutory 4summary revocation of the person's privilege to operate a 5motor vehicle, as provided in Section 6-208.1, and will also 6result in the disqualification of the person's privilege to 7operate a commercial motor vehicle, as provided in Section 86-514 of this Code, if the person is a CDL holder. The person 9shall also be warned by the law enforcement officer that if the 10person submits to the test or tests provided in paragraph (a) 11of this Section and the alcohol concentration in the person's 12blood, other bodily substance, or breath is 0.08 or greater, 13or testing discloses the presence of cannabis as listed in the 14Cannabis Control Act with a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration 15as defined in paragraph 6 of subsection (a) of Section 1611-501.2 of this Code, or any amount of a drug, substance, or 17compound resulting from the unlawful use or consumption of a 18controlled substance listed in the Illinois Controlled 19Substances Act, an intoxicating compound listed in the Use of 20Intoxicating Compounds Act, or methamphetamine as listed in 21the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act is 22detected in the person's blood, other bodily substance or 23urine, a statutory summary suspension of the person's 24privilege to operate a motor vehicle, as provided in Sections 256-208.1 and 11-501.1 of this Code, will be imposed. If the 26person is also a CDL holder, he or she shall be warned by the   HB2983 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1law enforcement officer that if the person submits to the test 2or tests provided in paragraph (a) of this Section and the 3alcohol concentration in the person's blood, other bodily 4substance, or breath is 0.08 or greater, or any amount of a 5drug, substance, or compound resulting from the unlawful use 6or consumption of cannabis as covered by the Cannabis Control 7Act, a controlled substance listed in the Illinois Controlled 8Substances Act, an intoxicating compound listed in the Use of 9Intoxicating Compounds Act, or methamphetamine as listed in 10the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act is 11detected in the person's blood, other bodily substance, or 12urine, a disqualification of the person's privilege to operate 13a commercial motor vehicle, as provided in Section 6-514 of 14this Code, will be imposed.15    A person who is under the age of 21 at the time the person 16is requested to submit to a test as provided above shall, in 17addition to the warnings provided for in this Section, be 18further warned by the law enforcement officer requesting the 19test that if the person submits to the test or tests provided 20in paragraph (a) of this Section and the alcohol concentration 21in the person's blood, other bodily substance, or breath is 22greater than 0.00 and less than 0.08, a suspension of the 23person's privilege to operate a motor vehicle, as provided 24under Sections 6-208.2 and 11-501.8 of this Code, will be 25imposed. The results of this test shall be admissible in a 26civil or criminal action or proceeding arising from an arrest   HB2983 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1for an offense as defined in Section 11-501 of this Code or a 2similar provision of a local ordinance or pursuant to Section 311-501.4 in prosecutions for reckless homicide brought under 4the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012. These 5test results, however, shall be admissible only in actions or 6proceedings directly related to the incident upon which the 7test request was made.8    A person requested to submit to a test shall also 9acknowledge, in writing, receipt of the warning required under 10this Section. If the person refuses to acknowledge receipt of 11the warning, the law enforcement officer shall make a written 12notation on the warning that the person refused to sign the 13warning. A person's refusal to sign the warning shall not be 14evidence that the person was not read the warning. 15    (d) If the person refuses testing or submits to a test that 16discloses an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more, or testing 17discloses the presence of cannabis as listed in the Cannabis 18Control Act with a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration as 19defined in paragraph 6 of subsection (a) of Section 11-501.2 20of this Code, or any amount of a drug, substance, or 21intoxicating compound in the person's breath, blood, other 22bodily substance, or urine resulting from the unlawful use or 23consumption of a controlled substance listed in the Illinois 24Controlled Substances Act, an intoxicating compound listed in 25the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, or methamphetamine as 26listed in the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection   HB2983 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1Act, the law enforcement officer shall immediately submit a 2sworn report to the circuit court of venue and the Secretary of 3State, certifying that the test or tests was or were requested 4under paragraph (a) and the person refused to submit to a test, 5or tests, or submitted to testing that disclosed an alcohol 6concentration of 0.08 or more, testing discloses the presence 7of cannabis as listed in the Cannabis Control Act with a 8tetrahydrocannabinol concentration as defined in paragraph 6 9of subsection (a) of Section 11-501.2 of this Code, or any 10amount of a drug, substance, or intoxicating compound in the 11person's breath, blood, other bodily substance, or urine 12resulting from the unlawful use or consumption of a controlled 13substance listed in the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an 14intoxicating compound listed in the Use of Intoxicating 15Compounds Act, or methamphetamine as listed in the 16Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act. If the 17person is also a CDL holder and refuses testing or submits to a 18test that discloses an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more, 19or any amount of a drug, substance, or intoxicating compound 20in the person's breath, blood, other bodily substance, or 21urine resulting from the unlawful use or consumption of 22cannabis listed in the Cannabis Control Act, a controlled 23substance listed in the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an 24intoxicating compound listed in the Use of Intoxicating 25Compounds Act, or methamphetamine as listed in the 26Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, the law   HB2983 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1enforcement officer shall also immediately submit a sworn 2report to the circuit court of venue and the Secretary of 3State, certifying that the test or tests was or were requested 4under paragraph (a) and the person refused to submit to a test, 5or tests, or submitted to testing that disclosed an alcohol 6concentration of 0.08 or more, or any amount of a drug, 7substance, or intoxicating compound in the person's breath, 8blood, other bodily substance, or urine resulting from the 9unlawful use or consumption of cannabis listed in the Cannabis 10Control Act, a controlled substance listed in the Illinois 11Controlled Substances Act, an intoxicating compound listed in 12the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, or methamphetamine as 13listed in the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection 14Act.15    (e) Upon receipt of the sworn report of a law enforcement 16officer submitted under paragraph (d), the Secretary of State 17shall enter the statutory summary suspension or revocation and 18disqualification for the periods specified in Sections 6-208.1 19and 6-514, respectively, and effective as provided in 20paragraph (g).21    If the person is a first offender as defined in Section 2211-500 of this Code, and is not convicted of a violation of 23Section 11-501 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 24ordinance, then reports received by the Secretary of State 25under this Section shall, except during the actual time the 26Statutory Summary Suspension is in effect, be privileged   HB2983 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1information and for use only by the courts, police officers, 2prosecuting authorities or the Secretary of State, unless the 3person is a CDL holder, is operating a commercial motor 4vehicle or vehicle required to be placarded for hazardous 5materials, in which case the suspension shall not be 6privileged. Reports received by the Secretary of State under 7this Section shall also be made available to the parent or 8guardian of a person under the age of 18 years that holds an 9instruction permit or a graduated driver's license, regardless 10of whether the statutory summary suspension is in effect. A 11statutory summary revocation shall not be privileged 12information. 13    (f) The law enforcement officer submitting the sworn 14report under paragraph (d) shall serve immediate notice of the 15statutory summary suspension or revocation on the person and 16the suspension or revocation and disqualification shall be 17effective as provided in paragraph (g). 18        (1) In cases involving a person who is not a CDL holder 19    where the blood alcohol concentration of 0.08 or greater 20    or any amount of a drug, substance, or compound resulting 21    from the unlawful use or consumption of a controlled 22    substance listed in the Illinois Controlled Substances 23    Act, an intoxicating compound listed in the Use of 24    Intoxicating Compounds Act, or methamphetamine as listed 25    in the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection 26    Act is established by a subsequent analysis of blood,   HB2983 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    other bodily substance, or urine or analysis of whole 2    blood or other bodily substance establishes a 3    tetrahydrocannabinol concentration as defined in paragraph 4    6 of subsection (a) of Section 11-501.2 of this Code, 5    collected at the time of arrest, the arresting officer or 6    arresting agency shall give notice as provided in this 7    Section or by deposit in the United States mail of the 8    notice in an envelope with postage prepaid and addressed 9    to the person at his or her address as shown on the Uniform 10    Traffic Ticket and the statutory summary suspension shall 11    begin as provided in paragraph (g).12        (1.3) In cases involving a person who is a CDL holder 13    where the blood alcohol concentration of 0.08 or greater 14    or any amount of a drug, substance, or compound resulting 15    from the unlawful use or consumption of cannabis as 16    covered by the Cannabis Control Act, a controlled 17    substance listed in the Illinois Controlled Substances 18    Act, an intoxicating compound listed in the Use of 19    Intoxicating Compounds Act, or methamphetamine as listed 20    in the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection 21    Act is established by a subsequent analysis of blood, 22    other bodily substance, or urine collected at the time of 23    arrest, the arresting officer or arresting agency shall 24    give notice as provided in this Section or by deposit in 25    the United States mail of the notice in an envelope with 26    postage prepaid and addressed to the person at his or her   HB2983 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    address as shown on the Uniform Traffic Ticket and the 2    statutory summary suspension and disqualification shall 3    begin as provided in paragraph (g). 4        (1.5) The officer shall confiscate any Illinois 5    driver's license or permit on the person at the time of 6    arrest. If the person has a valid driver's license or 7    permit, the officer shall issue the person a receipt, in a 8    form prescribed by the Secretary of State, that will allow 9    that person to drive during the periods provided for in 10    paragraph (g). The officer shall immediately forward the 11    driver's license or permit to the Secretary of State 12    circuit court of venue along with the sworn report 13    provided for in paragraph (d).14        (2) (Blank). 15    (g) The statutory summary suspension or revocation and 16disqualification referred to in this Section shall take effect 17on the 46th day following the date the notice of the statutory 18summary suspension or revocation was given to the person.19    (h) The following procedure shall apply whenever a person 20is arrested for any offense as defined in Section 11-501 or a 21similar provision of a local ordinance:22    Upon receipt of the sworn report from the law enforcement 23officer, the Secretary of State shall confirm the statutory 24summary suspension or revocation by mailing a notice of the 25effective date of the suspension or revocation to the person 26and the court of venue. The Secretary of State shall also mail   HB2983 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1notice of the effective date of the disqualification to the 2person. However, should the sworn report be defective by not 3containing sufficient information or be completed in error, 4the confirmation of the statutory summary suspension or 5revocation shall not be mailed to the person or entered to the 6record; instead, the sworn report shall be forwarded to the 7court of venue with a copy returned to the issuing agency 8identifying any defect.9    (i) As used in this Section, "personal injury" includes 10any Type A injury as indicated on the traffic crash report 11completed by a law enforcement officer that requires immediate 12professional attention in either a doctor's office or a 13medical facility. A Type A injury includes severely bleeding 14wounds, distorted extremities, and injuries that require the 15injured party to be carried from the scene. 16(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 17    (625 ILCS 5/11-703)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-703)18    Sec. 11-703. Overtaking a vehicle on the left. The 19following rules govern the overtaking and passing of vehicles 20proceeding in the same direction, subject to those 21limitations, exceptions, and special rules otherwise stated in 22this Chapter:23        (a) The driver of a vehicle overtaking another vehicle 24    proceeding in the same direction shall pass to the left 25    thereof at a safe distance and shall not again drive to the   HB2983 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    right side of the roadway until safely clear of the 2    overtaken vehicle. In no event shall such movement be made 3    by driving off the pavement or the main traveled portion 4    of the roadway.5        (b) Except when overtaking and passing on the right is 6    permitted, the driver of an overtaken vehicle shall give 7    way to the right in favor of the overtaking vehicle on 8    audible signal and shall not increase the speed of his 9    vehicle until completely passed by the overtaking vehicle.10        (c) The driver of a 2 wheeled vehicle may not, in 11    passing upon the left of any vehicle proceeding in the 12    same direction, pass upon the right of any vehicle 13    proceeding in the same direction unless there is an 14    unobstructed lane of traffic available to permit such 15    passing maneuver safely.16        (d) The operator of a motor vehicle overtaking a 17    bicycle or individual proceeding in the same direction on 18    a highway shall:19            (1) if another lane of traffic proceeding in the 20        same direction is available, make a lane change into 21        another available lane with due regard for safety and 22        traffic conditions, if practicable and not prohibited 23        by law, before overtaking or passing the bicycle or 24        individual; and25            (2) leave a safe distance, but not less than 3 26        feet, when passing the bicycle or individual and shall   HB2983 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1        maintain that distance until safely past the overtaken 2        bicycle or individual.3        (d-5) A driver of a motor vehicle overtaking a bicycle 4    proceeding in the same direction on a highway may, subject 5    to the provisions in paragraph (d) of this Section and 6    Section 11-706 of this Code, pass to the left of the 7    bicycle on a portion of the highway designated as a 8    no-passing zone under Section 11-707 of this Code if the 9    driver is able to overtake and pass the bicycle when:10            (1) the bicycle is traveling at a speed of less 11        than half of the posted speed limit of the highway;12            (2) the driver is able to overtake and pass the 13        bicycle without exceeding the posted speed limit of 14        the highway; and15            (3) there is sufficient distance to the left of 16        the centerline of the highway for the motor vehicle to 17        meet the overtaking and passing requirements under 18        this Section. 19        (e) A person driving a motor vehicle shall not, in a 20    reckless manner, drive the motor vehicle unnecessarily 21    close to, toward, or near a bicyclist, pedestrian, or a 22    person riding a horse or driving an animal drawn vehicle.23        (f) Every person convicted of paragraph (e) of this 24    Section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if the 25    violation does not result in great bodily harm or 26    permanent disability or disfigurement to another. If the   HB2983 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1    violation results in great bodily harm or permanent 2    disability or disfigurement to another, the person shall 3    be guilty of a Class 3 felony. 4(Source: P.A. 100-359, eff. 1-1-18.) 5    (625 ILCS 5/11-1425)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-1425)6    Sec. 11-1425. Stop when traffic obstructed. 7    (a) No driver shall enter an intersection or a marked 8crosswalk or drive onto any railroad grade crossing unless 9there is sufficient space on the other side of the 10intersection, crosswalk or railroad grade crossing to 11accommodate the vehicle he is operating without obstructing 12the passage of other vehicles, pedestrians, or railroad trains 13notwithstanding any traffic-control signal indication to 14proceed.15    (b) No driver shall enter a highway rail grade crossing 16unless there is sufficient space on the other side of the 17highway rail grade crossing to accommodate the vehicle being 18operated without obstructing the passage of a train or other 19railroad equipment using the rails, notwithstanding any 20traffic-control signal indication to proceed.21    (b-5) No driver operating a commercial motor vehicle, as 22defined in Section 6-500 of this Code, shall enter a highway 23rail grade crossing unless there is sufficient space on the 24other side of the highway rail grade crossing to accommodate 25the vehicle being operated without obstructing the passage of   HB2983 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1a train or other railroad equipment using the rails, 2notwithstanding any traffic-control signal indication to 3proceed. 4    (c) (Blank). 5    (d) Beginning with the effective date of this amendatory 6Act of the 95th General Assembly, the Secretary of State shall 7suspend for a period of one month the driving privileges of any 8person convicted of a violation of subsection (b) or (b-5) of 9this Section or a similar provision of a local ordinance; the 10Secretary shall suspend for a period of 3 months the driving 11privileges of any person convicted of a second or subsequent 12violation of subsection (b) or (b-5) of this Section or a 13similar provision of a local ordinance if the second or 14subsequent violation occurs within 5 years of a prior 15conviction for the same offense. In addition to the 16suspensions authorized by this Section, any person convicted 17of violating subsection (b) or (b-5) of this Section or a 18similar provision of a local ordinance shall be subject to a 19mandatory fine of $500 or 50 hours of community service. Any 20person given a disposition of court supervision for violating 21subsection (b) or (b-5) of this Section or a similar provision 22of a local ordinance shall also be subject to a mandatory fine 23of $500 or 50 hours of community service. Upon a second or 24subsequent violation, in addition to the suspensions 25authorized by this Section, the person shall be subject to a 26mandatory fine of $500 and 50 hours community service. The   HB2983 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 08654 LNS 18708 b1Secretary may also grant, for the duration of any suspension 2issued under this subsection, a restricted driving permit 3granting the privilege of driving a motor vehicle between the 4driver's residence and place of employment or within other 5proper limits that the Secretary of State shall find necessary 6to avoid any undue hardship. A restricted driving permit 7issued hereunder shall be subject to cancellation, revocation, 8and suspension by the Secretary of State in like manner and for 9like cause as a driver's license may be cancelled, revoked, or 10suspended; except that a conviction upon one or more offenses 11against laws or ordinances regulating the movement of traffic 12shall be deemed sufficient cause for the revocation, 13suspension, or cancellation of the restricted driving permit. 14The Secretary of State may, as a condition to the issuance of a 15restricted driving permit, require the applicant to 16participate in a designated driver remedial or rehabilitative 17program. Any conviction for a violation of this subsection 18shall be included as an offense for the purposes of 19determining suspension action under any other provision of 20this Code, provided however, that the penalties provided under 21this subsection shall be imposed unless those penalties 22imposed under other applicable provisions are greater. 23(Source: P.A. 103-179, eff. 6-30-23.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.